nl: Sensor meetmodus: Cadans; Vermogen; Snelheid; Snelheid en cadans; Overig
pt-PT: Modo de medição do sensor: Cadência; Potência; Velocidade; Velocidade e cadência; Outro
da: Sensors måletilstand: Kadence; Effekt; Hastighed; Hastighed og kadence; Andet
pl: Tryb pomiaru czujnika: Kadencja; Moc; Prędkość; Prędkość i kadencja; Inne
ko: 센서 측정 모드: 케이던스; 파워; 속도; 속도 및 케이던스; 기타
nb: Målemodus for sensor: Kadens; Effekt; Hastighet; Hastighet og kadens; Annet
sk-SK: Režim merania senzora: Kadencia; Výkon; Rýchlosť; Rýchlosť a kadencia; Iné
ru: Режим измерения датчика: Каденс; Мощность; Скорость; Скорость и каденс; Другое
cs: Mód měření senzoru: Kadence; Výkon; Rychlost; Rychlost a kadence; Jiné
lt-LT: Jutiklio matavimo režimas: Kadensas; Galia; Greitis; Greitis ir kadensas; Kita
zh-TW: 感測器測量模式: 踏頻; 功率; 速度; 速度與踏頻; 其他
fr: Mode de mesure du capteur: Cadence; Puissance; Vitesse; Vitesse et cadence; Autre
en: Sensor measurement mode: Cadence; Power; Speed; Speed & Cadence; Other
bg-BG: Режим на измерване на сензора: Каданс; Мощност; Скорост; Скорост и каданс; Друго
zh-CN: 传感器测量模式: 踏频; 功率; 速度; 速度与踏频; 其他
it: Modalità di misurazione del sensore: Cadenza; Potenza; Velocità; Velocità e cadenza; Altro
tr: Sensör ölçüm modu: Kadans; Güç; Hız; Hız ve Kadans; Diğer
de: Sensormessmodus: Trittfrequenz; Leistung; Geschwindigkeit; Geschwindigkeit und Trittfrequenz; Andere
sl-SI: Način merjenja senzorja: Kadenca; Moč; Hitrost; Hitrost in kadenca; Drugo
hu: Érzékelő mérési módja: Pedálfordulat; Teljesítmény; Sebesség; Sebesség és pedálfordulat; Egyéb
vi: Chế độ đo cảm biến: Nhịp đạp; Công suất; Tốc độ; Tốc độ & nhịp đạp; Khác
hr-HR: Način mjerenja osjetnika: Kadenca; Snaga; Brzina; Brzina i kadenca; Ostalo
el: Λειτουργία μέτρησης αισθητήρα: Ρυθμός πεταλιάς; Ισχύς; Ταχύτητα; Ταχύτητα και ρυθμός πεταλιάς; Άλλο
th: โหมดการวัดเซ็นเซอร์: รอบขา; กำลัง; ความเร็ว; ความเร็วและรอบขา; อื่นๆ
ja: センサー測定モード: ケイデンス; パワー; スピード; スピードおよびケイデンス; その他
pt-BR: Sensor modo de medição: Cadência; Potência; Velocidade; Velocidade e cadência; Outros
ro-RO: Mod de măsurare al senzorului: Cadență; Putere; Viteză; Viteză și cadență; Altele
sv: Mätläge för sensor: Kadens; Effekt; Hastighet; Hastighet och kadens; Övrigt
es: Modo de medición del sensor: Cadencia; Potencia; Velocidad; Velocidad y cadencia; Otro
fi: Anturin mittaustila: Kadenssi; Teho; Nopeus; Nopeus ja kadenssi; Muu